src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-ruottad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ruottâđ: # ML checked


    ruottâđ+V+Inf: ruottâđ
    
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâdâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ruotâdah
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruotâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ruotâdeen
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ruotâdvettee
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ruotâdává
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruotâdeh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruotâdim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ruotâdij
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruotâdii
    
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ruotâdiččim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ruotâdičij
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ruotâdižžeem
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ruotâdiš
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ruotâdâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâdižžii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: ruotâdâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: ruotâdhánnáá
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: ruotâdem
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: ruotâdmân
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: ruotâdmin
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: ruotâdmist
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: ruotâddijn
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg1: ruotâddijnân
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg2: ruotâddijnâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger+PxSg3: ruotâddijnis
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: ruotâddijn
    
    ruottâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâstâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâttâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâškuáđám
